Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1586
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 55;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 17.
July 18, 2026